Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2116
Changes by Laws 2002, LB 905; applicability.

The changes made by Laws 2002, LB 905, apply to decedents dying and to generation-skipping transfers made on and after January 1, 2003.

Laws 2002, LB 905, § 11.